North Carolina, session 2025, HB280.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Aging and Adult Services, the sum of thirty thousand
dollars ($30,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to cover costs
associated with the operations of the North Carolina Senior Tar Heel Legislature created by
G.S. 143B-181.55.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H280-v-1*